Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2794.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 19.20
BEVERAGE CONTAINER RECYCLING ACT
23-19.20-1. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following words and terms shall have the following meanings
unless a different meaning is clearly indicated by the context:
(1) "Applicable refund value" means the value established pursuant to the provisions of §
23-19.20-13.
(2) "Beverage" means a drinkable liquid intended for human oral consumption. Beverage
does not include:
(i) A drug regulated under the federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. Ch. 9, §
301 through § 399i;
(ii) One hundred percent (100%) fluid milk;
(iii) Infant formula; or
(iv) A meal replacement liquid.
(3) "Beverage container" means any prepackaged container designed to hold beverages,
including the label, cap, and any other material attached to the container at the time of distribution.
(4) "Beverage container collection mechanism" means any manual or technological means

by which empty covered beverage containers are properly identified as part of processing a
consumer's refund.
(5) "Brand" means a name, symbol, word, or mark that identifies a product and attributes
the product and its components, including packaging, to the brand owner.
(6) "Brand owner" means a person that owns or holds an exclusive license to a brand or
that otherwise has rights to market a product under the brand, whether or not the brand's trademark
is registered.
(7) "Canner" means individuals who collect and redeem covered beverage containers for
critical income.
(8) "Centralized processing facilities" means a facility that sorts and then bales or
aggregates covered beverage containers and associated materials for the purpose of recycling.
(9) "Consumer" means an individual who purchases a beverage in the State of Rhode Island
in a beverage container for consumption.
(10)" Covered beverage container" means any beverage container subject to a recycling
refund as defined in the recycling refund program plan.
(11) "De minimis" means a person that in the most recent fiscal year earned global gross
revenues, not including on-premises alcohol sales, for the prior fiscal year of:
(i) Until January 1, 2031, less than two million dollars ($2,000,000); or
(ii) Beginning January 1, 2031, less than two million dollars ($2,000,000), as adjusted for
inflation by the department.
(12) "Department" means the department of environmental management.
(13) "Drop-off facilities" means a specific area where individuals may bring household
recyclable materials to be sorted into material-specific receptacles and is located in the State of
Rhode Island.
(14) "Environmental impact" means the impact of a covered material on human health and
the environment from extraction and processing of the raw materials composing the covered
material through manufacturing, distribution, use, recovery for reuse or recycling, and final
disposal.
(15) "Environmental justice area" means a census block group with a low-income and/or
minority population greater than twice the statewide average.
(16) "Executive director" means the executive director of the recycling refund producer
responsibility organization.
(17) "Express redemption site" means a designated return point that allows consumers to
return covered beverage containers. These locations shall not require cash handling on-site; rather,
LC005461 - Page 2 of 27

upon return, if needed, beverage containers shall be transported to centralized processing facilities,
and refunds shall be credited to the consumer's virtual account. This process may include bag-drop
systems, reverse vending machines, or other beverage container collection mechanisms to enhance
convenience and accessibility for consumers.
(18) "Fraudulent activity" means any of the following:
(i) Redeeming a beverage container purchased outside the State of Rhode Island;
(ii) Altering a beverage container not eligible for a refund in the State of Rhode Island
recycling refund system to make it appear eligible for a refund;
(iii) Altering a receipt to increase the payout beyond the amount from appropriately
redeeming covered beverage containers; and
(iv) Tampering with beverage container collection mechanisms to enable redemption of a
beverage container or knowingly attempting to redeem a beverage container that:
(A) Was not purchased in Rhode Island;
(B) Is not in the Rhode Island recycling refund system;
(C) Had no deposit paid on it in the State of Rhode Island; or
(D) Has already been redeemed for a refund.
(19) "Full-service redemption site" means a return point where individuals may return
covered beverage containers to receive immediate refunds for their returns.
(20) "Government entity" means any:
(i) City, town, or other local government, including any municipal corporation, quasi-
municipal corporation, or special purpose district, or any office, department, division, bureau,
board, commission, or agency thereof, or other local public agency;
(ii) State office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other state agency;
(iii) Federally recognized Indian tribes whose traditional lands and territories include parts
of Rhode Island; or
(iv) Federal office, department, division, bureau, board, commission, or other federal
agency.
(21) "Independent auditor" means an independent and actively licensed certified public
accountant who is:
(i) Retained by a producer responsibility organization;
(ii) Not otherwise employed by or affiliated with a producer responsibility organization;
and
(iii) Qualified to conduct an audit under State of Rhode Island law.
(22) "Labor organization" means any organization that exists and is constituted for the
LC005461 - Page 3 of 27

purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining, or of dealing with employers concerning
grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or of other mutual aid or protection.
(23) "Lobbying" means the practice of promoting, opposing, or in any manner influencing
or attempting to influence the introduction, defeat, or enactment of legislation before any legislative
body; opposing or in any manner influencing the executive approval, veto, or amendment of
legislation; or the practice of promoting, opposing, or in any manner influencing or attempting to
influence the enactment, promulgation, modification, or deletion of regulations before any
regulatory body. The term does not include providing public testimony before a legislative body or
regulatory body or any committee thereof.
(24) "Material recovery facility" means a facility in the State of Rhode Island that collects,
compacts, repackages, sorts, or processes for transport source separated material for the purpose of
recycling.
(25) "Municipality" means the individual cities and towns of the State of Rhode Island.
(26) "Packaging manufacturer" means any person, firm, association, partnership, or
corporation that produces packaging or a packaging component of covered beverage containers.
(27) "Postconsumer recycled content" means the amount of postconsumer material used
by a producer in the production of a covered materials type, divided by the total amount of that
covered materials type used for products sold or distributed by the producer in that same calendar
year.
(28) "Producer" means the brand owner responsible for the brand visible on a covered
beverage container and who is responsible for compliance with the requirements under this chapter
for a covered beverage container that is sold or offered for sale, either physically or via e-commerce,
in the State of Rhode Island. "Producer" does not include:
(i) Government entities; or
(ii) Registered 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) charitable organizations and 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(4)
social welfare organizations.
(29) "Recycling" means the series of activities by which material is collected, transported,
sorted, and processed for use in industrial feedstocks in place of virgin materials to manufacture
new products with minimal loss of material quality and quantity. "Recycling" does not include:
(i) Landfill disposal;
(ii) Use as alternative daily cover or any other beneficial use at a landfill; or
(iii) Energy recovery, energy generation, or fuel production by any means including, but
not limited to, combustion, incineration, pyrolysis, gasification, solvolysis, or waste-to-fuel.
(30) "Recycling refund" means a covered beverage container redemption program that pays
LC005461 - Page 4 of 27

a per-unit refund value to persons for covered beverage containers and collects and processes
covered beverage containers as described in this chapter.
(31) "Recycling refund advisory council" means the council established under the
provisions of § 23-19.20-4.
(32) "Recycling refund processing facility" means a location that is designated by the
recycling refund producer responsibility organization to receive, sort, and prepare redeemed
beverage containers for recycling or reuse.
(33) "Recycling refund producer responsibility organization" means a nonprofit
corporation that is tax exempt under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code
created by a group of recycling refund covered beverage containers producers to implement
activities under the provisions of this chapter.
(34) "Recycling refund program plan" means a program plan developed by the recycling
refund producer responsibility organization that is prepared and submitted to the department for
review and approval.
(35) "Redemption rate" means the number of covered beverage containers redeemed for
the recycling refund divided by the number of covered beverage containers sold in the State of
Rhode Island in a calendar year. Covered beverage containers transferred by material recovery
facilities to additional materials processing or end markets are not included in the redemption rate.
(36) "Redemption site" means a public or private place that provides via any beverage
container collection mechanism the ability to redeem a covered beverage container for which a
deposit was paid.
(37) "Responsible market" means a materials market that:
(i) First produces and sells, transfers, or uses recycled organic product or recycled content
feedstock that meets the quality standards necessary to be used in the creation of new or
reconstituted products in a manner that protects the environment and minimizes risks to public
health and worker health and safety;
(ii) Complies with all applicable statutes, rules, ordinances, and other laws governing
environmental, health, safety, and financial responsibility from any government entity;
(iii) Possesses all requisite licenses and permits required by a federal or state agency or
political subdivision;
(iv) If the market operates in the State of Rhode Island, manages waste according to the
waste management goal and priority order of waste management practices stated in statute; and
(v) Minimizes adverse impacts to environmental justice areas.
(38) "Retail establishment" means any person, corporation, partnership, business, facility,
LC005461 - Page 5 of 27

vendor, organization, or individual that sells or provides merchandise, goods, or materials directly
to a consumer that engages in the sale of beverages that are covered beverage containers intended
for consumption off-site.
(39) "Reusable" means capable of reuse.
(40) "Reuse" means the redemption and return of a covered beverage container to the
marketplace and the continued use of the covered material by a producer or service provider when
the covered material is:
(i) Intentionally designed and marketed to be used multiple times for its original intended
purpose without a change in form;
(ii) Designed for durability and maintenance to extend its useful life and reduce demand
for new production of the covered material;
(iii) Supported by adequate logistics and infrastructure at a retail location, by a service
provider, or on behalf of or by a producer, that provides convenient access for consumers; and
(iv) Compliant with all applicable statutes, rules, ordinances, and other laws governing
health and safety from any government entity.
(41) "Reuse rate" means the share of units of a reusable covered beverage container
introduced into the State of Rhode Island in a calendar year that are demonstrated and deemed
reusable in accordance with an approved plan.
(42) "Service provider" means an entity that provides covered services for covered
materials. A political subdivision that provides or that contracts or otherwise arranges with another
party to provide covered services for covered materials within its jurisdiction may be a service
provider regardless of whether it provided, contracted for, or otherwise arranged for similar services
before the approval of the applicable producer responsibility plan.
(43) "Third-party certification" means certification by an accredited independent
organization that a standard or process required by this chapter or a recycling refund program plan
approved under this chapter has been achieved.
(44) "Unredeemed deposit" means a deposit paid by a consumer to a retailer upon purchase
of a covered beverage container for which no person claimed the deposit by returning the beverage
container to a redemption site.
23-19.20-2. Registration of producer responsibility organization.
(a) Appointment of recycling refund producer responsibility organization. By January 1,
2027, the department shall accept applications from recycling refund producer responsibility
organizations to represent producers in fulfilling the requirements of the provisions of this chapter.
By April 1, 2027, the department may approve, for a period not to exceed ten (10) years, a single
LC005461 - Page 6 of 27

recycling refund producer responsibility organization if the recycling refund producer
responsibility organization demonstrates that it:
(1) Is an independent nonprofit organization that qualifies for tax exemption under 26
U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code;
(2) Has the ability to administer the requirements of a recycling refund program plan under
the provisions of this chapter;
(3) Has a governing board consisting of producers that represent the diversity of beverage
containers in the market;
(4) Has adequate financial responsibility and financial controls to ensure proper
management of funds and payment of the registration fee required under the provisions of this
chapter; and
(5) Meets any other reasonable requirements set by the department.
(b) Registration fee.
(1) By November 1, 2027, the recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall
submit a one-time payment to the department, in lieu of a registration fee, in an amount determined
by the department, to cover the previously incurred costs and future estimated costs of the
department under this chapter from the effective date of this chapter through paying the annual
registration fee required in subsection (b)(2) of this section. By August 1, 2027, the department
shall provide written notice to the appointed packaging producer responsibility organization in
writing of the amount of the registration fee.
(2) On July 1, 2028, and on each July 1 thereafter, the recycling refund producer
responsibility organization shall submit to the department a registration fee, as determined by the
department. By May 1, 2028, and on each May 1 thereafter, the department shall provide written
notice to the registered recycling refund producer responsibility organization in writing of the
amount of the registration fee. The registration fee shall not exceed the department's estimate of the
costs required to:
(i) Administer, implement, and enforce the provisions of this chapter, including staff costs;
(ii) Promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter, if
applicable; and
(iii) Provide reimbursement for staffing for the advisory council.
(c) The department shall annually reconcile the fees paid by a recycling refund producer
responsibility organization under subsection (b) of this section with the actual costs incurred by the
department by means of credits or refunds to or additional payments required of a producer
responsibility organization, as applicable.
LC005461 - Page 7 of 27

(d) Disposition of fees. All fees received under this section shall be deposited with the
general treasurer and credited to the recycling refund program account under the provisions of §
23-19.20-22.
(e) Approval revocation. The department may revoke the approval of the recycling refund
producer responsibility organization if the department determines that the recycling refund
producer responsibility organization:
(1) Failed to meet the redemption rate targets four (4) years in a row; and
(2) Has not made reasonable progress over this four (4) year period toward compliance.
(f) If the department exercises its authority under subsections (e) of this section, then the
department shall set dates to restart the appointment process and the previously approved recycling
refund producer responsibility organization shall continue operating until the department appoints
a new recycling refund producer responsibility organization.
23-19.20-3. Recycling refund producer responsibility organization duties.
Recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall:
(1) Register with the department and pay the department fees, as required under the
provisions of § 23-19.20-2;
(2) Submit a recycling refund producer plan to the department, as required under the
provisions of this chapter;
(3) Implement recycling refund producer plans approved by the department under the
provisions of this chapter;
(4) Establish by September 1, 2027, an initial producer fee structure to fund the initial
implementation of the program, to be used until the recycling refund producer responsibility
organization has an approved program plan as required under the provisions of this chapter;
(5) Collect fees annually from registered producers;
(6) Submit the reports required under the provisions of this chapter;
(7) Ensure that producers operating under a recycling refund program plan administered
by the recycling refund producer responsibility organization comply with the requirements of the
recycling refund program plan and with the provisions of this chapter;
(8) Expel a producer from the recycling refund producer responsibility organization if
efforts to return the producer to compliance with the plan or with the requirements of this chapter
are unsuccessful;
(9) Notify the department when a producer has been expelled;
(10) Consider and respond in writing within ninety (90) days to comments received from
the advisory council, including justifications for not incorporating board recommendations;
LC005461 - Page 8 of 27

(11) Maintain a website with the information required under the provisions of § 23-19.20-
12;
(12) Notify the department within thirty (30) days of a change made to the contact
information for a person responsible for implementing the recycling refund producer responsibility
plan, to board membership, or to the executive director;
(13) Contract directly with service providers and provide payments in a timely manner;
and
(14) Comply with all other applicable requirements of the provisions of this chapter.
23-19.20-4. Advisory council.
(a) Establishment. The recycling refund advisory council is established to review all
activities conducted by recycling refund producer responsibility organizations under this chapter
and to advise the department and recycling refund producer responsibility organizations regarding
the implementation of the provisions of this chapter.
(b) Duties. The recycling refund advisory council shall:
(1) Convene its initial meeting by June 1, 2027;
(2) Establish a date and a process by which it will accept public comments;
(3) Review the recycling refund program plan and provide comments to the recycling
refund producer responsibility organization, prior to the draft being issued as an official draft for
public comment, to ensure the recycling refund program plan:
(i) Aligns with best practices;
(ii) Reflects the reality in the State of Rhode Island; and
(iii) Considers the needs of the State of Rhode Island;
(4) Review program reports and audits and raise issues for recycling refund producer
responsibility organization follow-up or department enforcement action;
(5) Review annual reports and provide comments to the department; and
(6) Ensure that the recycling refund producer responsibility organization and department
are considering a broad range of perspectives in developing recycling refund program plans and in
implementing programs.
(c) Membership. By March 1, 2027, the department shall establish and appoint the initial
membership of the eleven (11) member recycling refund advisory council. The membership of the
recycling refund advisory council shall consist of representatives of the following:
(1) Two (2) members representing a non-federal or non-state government entity;
(2) One member representing a retailer, with a preference for a retailer that hosts beverage
container collection mechanisms;
LC005461 - Page 9 of 27

(3) One member representing a packaging manufacturer that is not a producer;
(4) One member representing the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation or a
recycling processor;
(5) One member representing an environmental nonprofit organization;
(6) One member representing an environmental justice organization;
(7) One member who is a canner or represents a canner organization;
(8) One member representing a labor organization; and
(9) Two (2) members representing other interested parties or additional members of
interests as determined by the department.
(d) In making these appointments, the department:
(1) Shall not appoint members who are State of Rhode Island legislators;
(2) Shall not appoint members who are employees of a producer required to be members
of a producer responsibility organization in the State of Rhode Island under the provisions of this
chapter; and
(3) Shall endeavor to appoint members from all regions of the State of Rhode Island.
(e) Chairperson. A chair shall be elected by majority vote of present members at the first
meeting of each year at which a quorum is present.
(f) Terms - Removal. Members serve for a term of four (4) years, except that the initial
term for a majority of the initial appointees shall be two (2) years in order that membership terms
are staggered. Members may be reappointed but shall not serve more than eight (8) consecutive
years. A member may be removed by the department for good cause.
(g) Quorum. A quorum is reached when a majority of advisory council member seats are
filled; and a majority of the non-vacant advisory council member seats is present.
(h) Voting. Action by the advisory council requires a quorum and a majority of those
present and voting. All members of the advisory council are voting members of the board.
(i) Meetings. Each advisory council shall meet at least two (2) times per year and may meet
more frequently upon ten (10) days' written notice at the request of the chair or a majority of its
members.
(j) Department role. The department shall provide administrative and operating support to
each advisory council, and the department may contract with a third-party facilitator to assist in
administering the activities of each advisory council, including establishing a website or landing
page on the department website. The department shall assist the advisory council in developing
policies and procedures governing the disclosure of perceived conflict of interest.
23-19.20-5. Producer responsibilities.
LC005461 - Page 10 of 27

(a) Duties. After July 1, 2027, a producer shall be a member of a recycling refund producer
responsibility organization registered in the State of Rhode Island.
(b) A producer shall:
(1) Register with the recycling refund producer responsibility organization;
(2) Implement the requirements of the recycling refund producer responsibility plan under
which the producer operates;
(3) Pay producer fees under the provisions of § 23-19.20-11;
(4) Provide necessary information for covered beverage containers to the recycling refund
producer responsibility organization at a frequency to be determined by the recycling refund
producer responsibility organization;
(5) Register with the recycling refund producer responsibility organization the barcode and
universal product code ("UPC") of all covered beverage containers introduced into the State of
Rhode Island; and
(6) Comply with all other applicable requirements of this chapter.
23-19.20-6. Sales restrictions.
Beverage container sales and distribution restrictions. After July 1, 2030, a person shall not
sell or distribute in or into the State of Rhode Island a covered beverage container of a producer
that is not participating in the recycling refund producer responsibility organization or that is not in
compliance with the requirements of this chapter or rules and regulations adopted under this
chapter.
23-19.20-7. Service providers.
(a) Contracting requirements. A recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall
require in any contract with a service provider that the service provider:
(1) Meets performance standards established in an approved producer responsibility plan
under the provisions of this chapter;
(2) Ensures that covered materials are sent to responsible markets; and
(3) Provides documentation to the recycling refund producer responsibility organization on
the amounts, covered materials types, and volumes of covered materials by covered service method.
(b) Bidding processes and ownership ability:
(1) For infrastructure investments included in an approved producer responsibility plan, a
recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall use the competitive bidding processes
and publicly post bid opportunities, except that preference shall be given to existing facilities,
providers of services, and holders of service accounts in the State of Rhode Island for collection
and recycling of covered beverage containers;
LC005461 - Page 11 of 27

(2) No recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall own or partially own
infrastructure that is used to fulfill obligations under the provisions of this chapter, except in the
following circumstances:
(i) A producer may hold an ownership stake in infrastructure used to fulfill obligations
under this chapter as long as the stake was held before enactment of this chapter and the ownership
stake is fully disclosed by the producer to the producer responsibility organization; or
(ii) After a bidding process described in this section under which no service provider bids
on the contract, the recycling refund producer responsibility organization may make infrastructure
investments identified under an approved recycling refund program plan to implement the
requirements in this chapter.
(c) Dispute resolution. A recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall
establish a dispute resolution process utilizing third-party mediators for disputes related to
payments.
23-19.20-8. Department responsibilities.
(a) Department responsibilities. The department shall:
(1) Appoint the initial membership of the advisory council, as required under the provisions
of § 23-19.20-4;
(2) Provide administrative and operating support to the advisory council;
(3) Review and determine whether to approve recycling refund program plans and
amendments to recycling refund program plans according to the provisions of this chapter;
(4) Post on the department's website:
(i) The most recent registration materials submitted by the producer responsibility
organizations;
(ii) Any packaging plan or amendment submitted by a recycling refund producer
responsibility organization that is in draft form during the public comment period;
(iii) Comments of the public, advisory council, and recycling refund producer
responsibility organization on program plans and needs assessments, and, if any, the responses of
the department to those comments; and
(iv) Links to adopted rules and regulations implementing this chapter;
(5) Review the selection of independent auditors to perform an annual financial audit of
the recycling refund producer responsibility organization; and
(6) Conduct enforcement actions as permitted under the provisions of this chapter.
(b) The department may alter the performance targets in § 23-19.20-10 and reporting
requirements of the provisions of this chapter to accommodate a recycling refund producer
LC005461 - Page 12 of 27

responsibility organization that is operating regionally with the state and one or more neighboring
states.
23-19.20-9. Recycling refund program plan.
(a) Recycling refund program plan submission and implementation.
(1) By September 1, 2028, and every five (5) years thereafter, a recycling refund producer
responsibility organization shall submit a recycling refund program plan to the department that
describes the proposed operation by the organization of the program to fulfill the requirements of
this chapter. Once approved, a recycling refund program plan remains in effect for five (5) years,
as amended, or until a subsequent recycling refund program plan is approved.
(2) By July 1, 2029, or within six (6) months of plan approval, whichever is later,
implement the plan approved by the department; subsequent recycling refund program plans shall
be implemented within six (6) months of approval by the department.
(b) Advisory council review of draft plan and amendments. A recycling refund producer
responsibility organization shall submit a draft recycling refund producer program plan or draft
amendment to the recycling refund advisory council prior to submitting the draft plan or draft
amendment to the department and shall, prior to submission of the draft plan or draft amendment
to the department, respond to recycling refund advisory council comments and recommendations
received within sixty (60) days of providing the draft program plan or draft amendment to the
recycling refund advisory council and indicate whether those comments or recommendations were
accepted or rejected.
(c) The recycling refund program plan shall contain the following:
(1) A list of the types of covered beverage containers that shall be included in the recycling
refund program, which at a minimum shall include all beverage containers that are:
(i) Glass bottles, rigid plastic bottles, or metal cans; and
(ii) Have a capacity between forty milliliters (40 ml) and one gallon;
(2) Proposed reuse rate performance targets with deadlines;
(3) How the recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall meet performance
targets for redemption rates as described in the provisions of this chapter and the proposed reuse
rate performance targets;
(4) How the performance targets shall be measured;
(5) How the recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall encourage
improvements in the design of beverage containers for recyclability;
(6) The proposed convenience standard pursuant to the provisions of this chapter;
(7) How the proposed network of redemption sites satisfies the convenience standards set
LC005461 - Page 13 of 27

pursuant to § 23-19.20-14 and other provisions of this chapter and addresses the evaluation criteria
established in this chapter, and provides sufficient opportunity for consumers of limited economic
means to get their applicable refund value pursuant to § 23-19.20-13 immediately upon redemption;
(8) How deposits collected from consumers shall be remitted to the recycling refund
producer responsibility organization;
(9) What incentives the recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall provide
to retail establishments in order that they choose to host covered beverage container collection
mechanisms;
(10) How the program shall conduct outreach and provide convenient redemption:
(i) Throughout the State of Rhode Island;
(ii) In rural, urban, and environmental justice areas; and
(iii) To those that redeem relatively large amounts of covered beverage containers;
(11) How beverage containers shall be marked or consumers otherwise made aware of the
beverage containers eligible for the applicable refund value;
(12) A description of how the recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall
educate the public on the recycling refund program and the availability of redemption sites,
including culturally responsive materials and methods to evaluate the efficacy of these efforts;
(13) A description of the producer fee structure established pursuant to the provisions of §
23-19.20-11 and how those fees shall be used to support the proposed network of redemption sites
and other costs of administrating the recycling refund producer responsibility organization and the
recycling refund program plan;
(14) An explanation of how the recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall
coordinate with the Rhode Island resource recovery corporation on implementation; and
(15) Any other reasonable information requested by the department.
(d) Review and approval procedure:
(1) The department shall review and approve, deny, or request additional information for
draft recycling refund program plans and draft plan amendments no later than one hundred twenty
(120) days after the date the department receives it from a recycling refund producer responsibility
organization or a recycling refund producer responsibility organization. The department shall post
a draft plan or draft amendment on the department's website and allow public comment for no less
than forty-five (45) days before approving, denying, or requesting additional information on a draft
plan or draft amendment;
(2) In reviewing the draft plan, the department shall consider, among other factors, the
following:
LC005461 - Page 14 of 27

(i) Feasibility;
(ii) Advisory council feedback;
(iii) Cost;
(iv) Goals and plans in the Rhode Island solid waste management plan;
(v) Increasing reuse;
(vi) Adequacy of consumer-facing communications, in order that consumers know which
beverage containers are in the recycling refund system and their refund value; and
(vi) Reducing unnecessary use of materials;
(3) If the department denies or requests additional information for a draft plan or draft
amendment, the department shall provide the recycling refund producer organization with the
reasons, in writing, that the plan or plan amendment does not meet the plan requirements in the
provisions of this chapter. The recycling refund producer organization has sixty (60) days from the
date that the rejection or request for additional information is received to submit to the department
any revisions or additional information necessary for the approval of the draft plan or draft
amendment. The department shall review and approve or disapprove the draft plan or draft
amendment no later than sixty (60) days after the date the department receives the revisions or
additional information; and
(4) A recycling refund producer organization may resubmit a draft plan or draft amendment
to the department on not more than two (2) occasions. If after the second resubmission, the
department determines that the draft plan or draft amendment does not meet the plan requirements
of this chapter, the department shall modify the draft plan or draft amendment as necessary for it
to meet the requirements of this chapter and approve it.
23-19.20-10. Performance targets.
(a) Redemption rate performance targets. The recycling refund producer responsibility
organization shall achieve the following performance targets:
(1) Starting with calendar year 2032, and each year thereafter, the annual redemption rate
aggregated for all covered beverage containers shall be greater than sixty-five percent (65%).
(2) Starting with calendar year 2035, and each year thereafter, the annual redemption rate
aggregated for all covered beverage containers shall be greater than eighty-five percent (85%).
(b) Reuse rate performance targets.
(1) The recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall achieve the reuse rate
performance target in the approved recycling refund program plan.
(2) The reuse rate performance targets in the program plan shall increase with each
subsequent program plan.
LC005461 - Page 15 of 27

23-19.20-11. Producer fees.
(a) Recycling refund producer responsibility organization annual fee. Costs to pay the
registration fee required by this chapter and to meet the performance targets in § 23-19.20-13 and
other provisions of this chapter and the convenience standards in § 23-19.20-14 and other
provisions of this chapter that exceed the amount retained through scrap value and unclaimed
deposits are to be paid by producers as a material-specific fee that is:
(1) Based on the cost to manage the material minus its scrap value, among other factors;
(2) Modulated based on factors to reduce environmental impact, which may include:
(i) Use of domestically sourced, verified postconsumer recycled content;
(ii) Compliance with industry-accepted design for recyclability standards;
(iii) Use of labeling to encourage appropriate recycling behaviors; and
(iv) Use of design factors that inhibit recyclability.
(b) The recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall offer a flat fee structure
for de minimis beverage producers.
(c) Overcollections. Revenue collected under this section that exceeds the amount needed
to pay the costs described in subsection (a) of this section, shall be used to improve or enhance
program outcomes.
(d) Prohibited conduct. Fees collected under this section shall not be used for lobbying.
23-19.20-12. Website requirements.
(a) A recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall maintain a website that
uses best practices for accessibility.
(b) The recycling refund producer responsibility organization website shall contain, at a
minimum:
(1) Information regarding a process that members of the public may use to contact the
recycling refund producer responsibility organization with questions;
(2) The draft and approved producer responsibility plans and any draft and approved
amendments;
(3) Annual reports submitted to the department;
(4) A link to related administrative rules and regulations implementing this chapter;
(5) The names of producers that are not in compliance with this chapter;
(6) A list, updated at least monthly, of all member producers operating under the recycling
refund producer responsibility plan;
(7) The list of covered beverage containers that are redeemable for the applicable refund
value under the provisions of § 23-19.20-13 and other provisions of this chapter;
LC005461 - Page 16 of 27

(8) Education materials on how to redeem covered beverage containers and the importance
of recycling covered beverage containers; and
(9) A list and map of all redemption sites currently accepting covered beverage containers
for a refund, including the hours each redemption site accepts covered beverage containers.
23-19.20-13. Applicable refund value.
(a) Applicable refund value. Every covered beverage container sold or offered for sale in
the State of Rhode Island shall have a refund value of ten cents ($.10) beginning July 1, 2030.
(b) If a redemption rate performance target was not met in each of the two (2) previous
calendar years, the department may adopt rules and regulations providing a higher refund value
than the refund value provided under subsection (a) of this section, as long as the modified refund
value is not based on the type of beverage container, but no more than:
(1) Once during any ten (10)-year period in consultation with the recycling refund producer
responsibility organization; and
(2) Once during any five (5)-year period if there is a request from the recycling refund
producer responsibility organization for a change in the refund amount.
(c) For covered beverage containers sold at retail, the retail establishment shall collect the
refund value and remit it to the recycling refund producer responsibility organization.
(d) The charge for the refund value of covered beverage containers shall be separately
stated on a receipt, invoice, or similar billing document provided to the consumer.
(e) Nonredeemable materials.
(1) Excluding the material recovery facility and drop-off facility payments in this section,
the recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall not be required to pay refunds on:
(i) A beverage container visibly containing or contaminated by a substance other than
water, residue of the original contents, or ordinary dust;
(ii) A beverage container that is broken or damaged to the extent that the brand appearing
on the container cannot be identified;
(iii) A beverage container that the recycling refund producer responsibility organization
has reasonable grounds to believe was bought in another state; or
(iv) A beverage container for which the recycling refund producer responsibility
organization has reasonable grounds to believe a refund has already been provided.
23-19.20-14. Convenience standard for redemption of beverage containers.
(a) Criteria for establishing a convenience standard. The recycling refund producer
responsibility organization shall propose a quantitative convenience standard for redemption of
containers in the recycling refund program plan that is based on the following:
LC005461 - Page 17 of 27

(1) Ensure all consumers who pay a deposit have reasonably convenient opportunities to
redeem;
(2) Ensure consumers who require refunds immediately have sufficient opportunity to
receive refunds immediately;
(3) Provide appropriately convenient and equitable access in urban, suburban, and rural
areas; and
(4) Accounts for total population, population density, sales of covered beverage containers
in regions of the State of Rhode Island, and proximity to centers of beverage sales business activity.
(b) Department evaluation of convenience standard and redemption system. The
department shall evaluate the proposed convenience standard based on the following criteria:
(1) Proximity to businesses that sell a high volume of covered beverages containers;
(2) Additional vehicle miles traveled;
(3) Car and public transportation access;
(4) Population density;
(5) Environmental justice areas;
(6) Average family income; and
(7) Needs of people collecting large amounts of covered beverage containers for primary
or important supplemental income.
(c) At least once per year, the department may audit the redemption system to determine
whether the recycling refund producer responsibility organization is meeting the convenience
standard in an approved recycling refund program plan and the redemption system requirements in
the provisions of this chapter, and the department shall conduct such an audit at least every five (5)
years.
(d) Failure to meet convenience standards. In the event that the recycling refund producer
responsibility organization does not meet the convenience standards in an approved program plan
for two (2) calendar years in a row, the department may initiate rulemaking to support the recycling
refund producer responsibility organization's program plan amendment to achieve the convenience
standards set forth in the provisions of this chapter.
23-19.20-15. Redemption system.
(a) Network for collecting qualifying covered beverage containers. The recycling refund
producer responsibility organization shall, at its own cost, install, operate, and maintain a network
of covered beverage container collection mechanisms for consumers to redeem covered beverage
containers for the applicable refund value per the provisions of § 23-19.20-13 that satisfies:
(1) The convenience standard in the provisions of § 23-19.20-14; and
LC005461 - Page 18 of 27

(2) The redemption rate performance targets in the provisions of § 23-19.20-10.
(b) The network of covered beverage container collection mechanisms shall include a mix
of ways for consumers to redeem covered beverage containers including express redemption sites
and full-service redemption sites at locations convenient to consumers such as nearby or in the
parking lots of retailers that sell covered beverage containers, nonprofit organization facilities, and
government sites.
(c) At a minimum, the network for collecting covered beverage containers shall:
(1) In each municipality with a population density less than one thousand (1,000) residents
per square mile, have:
(i) At least one redemption site in the municipality; or
(ii) At least one redemption site within one mile of a retail establishment greater than ten
thousand square feet (10,000 ft2) that is within three (3) miles of the municipality's border.
(2) In each municipality with a population density more than one thousand (1,000)
residents per square mile, have at least two (2) redemption sites;
(3) In each municipality with greater than twenty-five thousand (25,000) residents but
fewer than seventy-five thousand (75,000) residents, have at least one redemption site; and
(4) In each municipality with greater than seventy-five thousand (75,000) residents, at least
one redemption site in each zip code tabulation area.
(d) The recycling refund producer responsibility organization may establish and dissolve
partnerships with any organization or individual to enhance redemption network operations and
better serve consumers.
(e) Redemption site requirements. All redemption sites in the recycling refund producer
responsibility organization's redemption network shall:
(1) Be clean, safe, and well-lighted;
(2) Be accessible to persons with disabilities, including those related to mobility, hearing,
and sight;
(3) Be readily identifiable and clearly marked as being part of the recycling refund system;
(4) Appear on the recycling refund producer responsibility organization's website as
required in § 23-19.20-12 and other provisions of this chapter;
(5) Accept for redemption all covered beverage containers;
(6) Handle reusable containers in a manner that allows for their reuse;
(7) Accept covered beverage containers for redemption for at least eight (8) hours on all
weekdays and one weekend day, except on state and federal holidays;
(8) Post the hours of operation at a place that is clearly visible from outside; and
LC005461 - Page 19 of 27

(9) Provide year-round access during open hours free of charge.
(f) The department may approve a limited number of redemption sites to not comply with
all the requirements of this section to reduce costs or expand the number of redemption sites.
(g) Compensation and incentives for hosting redemption. The recycling refund producer
responsibility organization shall fairly compensate all locations hosting redemption sites for the
space occupied by the covered beverage container collection mechanisms.
(h) Retailer optionality. A retail establishment has no obligation under this chapter to host
a covered beverage container collection mechanism. A retail establishment that chooses to host a
redemption site is eligible to have a self-serve kiosk, located at the retail establishment at no charge
by the recycling refund producer responsibility organization, to facilitate the printing of redemption
vouchers, and pay the value of redemption vouchers to consumers that may be used on the premises.
The recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall reimburse retailers for the value of
valid vouchers redeemed by customers.
(i) Standard bags for bag drop. A retail establishment larger than twenty thousand square
feet (20,000 ft2) shall sell bags for the redemption program at the price established by the recycling
refund producer responsibility organization. If the standard bags for the bag-drop program are made
of plastic film, the recycling refund producer organization shall:
(1) Ensure that the bags have a minimum of fifty percent (50%) postconsumer recycled
content;
(2) Demonstrate, upon request of the department, that the waste film from the bags is being
recycled at responsible end markets; and
(3) Include instructions on the bag how the bag should be utilized and recycled through a
drop-off program.
(j) The recycling refund producer organization shall credit the cost of any required bag
purchase back to the customer when the bag is returned and processed through the deposit return
system.
23-19.20-16. Use of unredeemed deposits.
Any unredeemed deposits are to only be spent by the recycling refund producer
organization and only on any of the following purposes:
(1) Education and outreach activities to encourage redemption activity;
(2) Increasing the number of redemption sites; and
(3) Other activities that are described in the recycling refund program plan that directly
contribute to achieving the performance requirements described in § 23-19.20-10 and other
provisions of this chapter.
LC005461 - Page 20 of 27

23-19.20-17. Refund value to drop-off facilities and material recovery facilities.
Information required.
(1) Starting after the first full month that covered beverage containers are sold with the
applicable refund value and ending once the packaging program begins, the recycling refund
producer organization shall make a monthly payment directly to each material recovery facility and
drop-off facility based on data submitted by each material recovery facility drop-off facility under
the provisions of this chapter.
(2) The recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall establish a quality
standard for each material.
(3) On a monthly basis, the operator of a material recovery facility and drop-off facility
shall submit the following information to the recycling refund producer responsibility organization:
(i) The number of tons of covered beverage containers the facility received for processing
in the previous month by material; and
(ii) The number of tons of covered beverage containers the facility transferred to additional
materials processing or end markets in the previous month by material;
(4) The recycling refund producer organization shall convert the material tons to unit
equivalent using a methodology that is published on its website and developed in consultation with
material recovery facilities.
(5) The recycling refund producer organization shall pay each material recovery facility
and drop-off facility at least fifty percent (50%) of the refund value for each covered beverage
container that the material recovery facility transferred to additional materials processing or end
markets and that meets the quality standard provided for in subsection (2) of this section.
(6) Material recovery facilities shall share the payments with their customers consistent
with their supply agreements in order that communities and generators receive the appropriate
amount of the refund values paid to material recovery facilities and drop-off facilities.
(7) The operators of material recovery facilities and drop-off facilities shall use an industry-
standard scale to measure the weight of all covered beverage container materials that enter the
facility.
(8) The recycling refund producer responsibility organization may conduct quarterly audits
on the quality and quantity of the material recovery facilities' and drop-off facilities' material upon
request by the organization and at the organization's expense.
(9) The recycling refund producer responsibility organization may choose to partner with
a material recovery facility or drop-off facility to provide space and install the necessary equipment
to co-locate a recycling refund processing facility in the same vicinity.
LC005461 - Page 21 of 27

(10) Monthly payments to the material recovery facilities and drop-off facilities shall end
six (6) months after any extended producer responsibility program for paper and packaging shifts
the cost, in whole or in part, of collecting or processing residential recyclables to a producer
responsibility organization.
23-19.20-18. Reporting.
(a) Recycling refund producer responsibility organization annual report. On or before June
1, 2032, and on or before each June 1 thereafter, the recycling refund producer responsibility
organization shall submit a report to the department that contains, at a minimum, the following
information for the previous calendar year:
(1) Number of covered beverage containers sold in the State of Rhode Island, by material
type and whether reusable;
(2) Number of covered beverage containers redeemed through the recycling refund
redemption system, by material type;
(3) Number of times reusable covered beverage containers were sold;
(4) Number of times reusable covered beverage containers were returned through the
recycling refund program;
(5) An analysis of whether the recycling refund producer responsibility organization is on
track to reach the redemption rate performance targets specified in the provisions of this chapter
and the reuse rate performance targets specified in the recycling refund program plan, and what the
recycling refund producer responsibility organization is doing to achieve the performance targets
by the relevant deadlines;
(6) A list of redemption sites and processing facilities and their locations;
(7) Verification of materials handled at responsible end markets;
(8) Audited financial reports, including sources and uses of funds.
(9) An evaluation of convenience of the program with the same criteria the department
shall use under the provisions of this chapter; and
(10) A description of public awareness, education, and outreach activities undertaken by
the recycling refund producer responsibility organization, including analyses of their efficacy.
(b) The recycling refund producer responsibility organization that submits information or
records to the department under subsection (a) of this section may request that a portion of the
information or records be made available only for the confidential use of the department, the
director, or the appropriate division of the department. The director of the department shall give
consideration to the request, and if the director determines that this action is not detrimental to the
public interest, the director shall grant the request for the information to remain confidential.
LC005461 - Page 22 of 27

(c) Audits. All data reported by a recycling refund producer responsibility organization
under this section shall, at the request of the department no more than once annually, be audited by
an independent third party. A recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall be
responsible for all costs associated with the data audit. Auditable data shall only include data held
by a recycling refund producer responsibility organization. Auditing of any data inputs to the
recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall be the responsibility of the recycling
refund producer responsibility organization.
(d) Action following unmet redemption rate performance target or convenience standard.
A recycling refund producer responsibility organization that fails to meet a redemption rate
performance target or convenience standard required under or approved in a producer responsibility
plan shall, within ninety (90) days of filing an annual report under this section, file with the
department an explanation of the factors contributing to the failure and propose an amendment to
the producer responsibility plan specifying changes including in its operations that the recycling
refund producer responsibility organization shall make that are designed to achieve the redemption
rate performance targets and convenience standard.
(e) Department report. On or before October 15, 2033, and every two (2) years thereafter,
the department shall submit a report to the governor and to the chairs and ranking minority members
of the general assembly committees with jurisdiction over solid waste. The report shall contain:
(1) A summary of the operations of this chapter during the previous years including the
redemption rate performance targets versus actual performance;
(2) A link to reports filed under the provisions of this section;
(3) Recommendations for policy, statutory, or regulatory changes to the program;
(4) An analysis of the impacts of exempting certain materials from the definition of covered
materials and of exempting certain persons from the definition of producer;
(5) A list of efforts undertaken by the department to enforce and secure compliance with
the provisions of this chapter; and
(6) Any other information the department deems to be relevant.
(f) Materials recovery facilities and drop-off facilities. On or before April 1, 2031, and on
or before April 1 thereafter, each material recovery facility and drop-off facility that receives
covered materials shall report annually to the recycling refund producer responsibility organization
and the department including the following information for the previous calendar year:
(1) Amount of recycling refund covered beverage containers accepted and location of
origin (municipality, service provider, or other);
(2) Amount of material sold to market, by commodity type;
LC005461 - Page 23 of 27

(3) Amount of residue or waste that was generated; and
(4) Verification that covered beverage containers are sold to responsible markets.
23-19.20-19. Coordination plan.
(a) If an extended producer responsibility program for paper and packaging is enacted in
the State of Rhode Island, the paper and packaging producer responsibility organization and the
recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall create a coordination plan to ensure that
programs are complementary and that all targets are met. As part of the coordination plan, the paper
and packaging producer responsibility organization and the recycling refund producer
responsibility organization shall identify actions to jointly optimize infrastructure for recycling
collection and reuse that benefit both programs.
(b) The coordination plan between the producer responsibility organization for paper and
packaging and the recycling refund producer responsibility organization shall contain the
following:
(1) Education and outreach activities to ensure consistent messaging to consumers;
(2) A description of a reciprocal compensation mechanism such that the recycling refund
producer responsibility organization pays the paper and packaging producer responsibility
organization for covered beverage containers in material recovery facilities, and the packaging
producer responsibility organization pays a recycling refund producer organization for secondary
packaging managed through the recycling refund system;
(3) Mechanisms to evaluate packages and formats managed by each program and consider
opportunities for adding and removing packages from one program to the other; and
(4) An evaluation strategy to assess opportunities to coordinate identification of, and
efficient access to, collection infrastructure, processing infrastructure, reuse and infrastructure, and
responsible markets.
23-19.20-20. Enforcement authority and penalties.
(a) The department may administratively impose a civil penalty of up to one thousand
dollars ($1,000) per violation per day on any producer who violates this chapter and up to ten
thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation per day for the second and each subsequent violation.
(b) The department may administratively impose a civil penalty of up to one thousand
dollars ($1,000) per violation per day on the recycling refund producer responsibility organization
for violations of this chapter and up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation per day for the
second and each subsequent violation in any calendar year.
(c) The department may, in addition to assessing the penalties provided in subsections (a)
and (b) of this section, take any combination of the following actions:
LC005461 - Page 24 of 27

(1) Issue a corrective action order to a producer or a recycling refund producer
responsibility organization;
(2) Issue an order to a recycling refund producer responsibility organization to provide for
the continued implementation of the program in the absence of an approved plan;
(3) Revoke the producer responsibility organization's plan approval and require resubmittal
of a producer responsibility organization's plan;
(4) Require a producer responsibility organization to revise or resubmit a plan within a
specified time frame; or
(5) Require additional reporting related to the area of noncompliance.
(d) The department may assess a penalty on a person that engages in fraudulent activity.
The amount of the penalty that the department may assess under this section is twice the amount of
money the person received from the fraudulent activity in violation of this chapter or five hundred
dollars ($500), whichever is greater.
(e) The department may assess a penalty on a person that continues to sell or distribute
covered beverage containers of a producer that has been assessed a penalty under subsection (a) of
this section, sixty (60) days after the person receives a written warning from the department. The
amount of the penalty that the department may assess hereunder is twice the value of the covered
beverage containers sold in violation of this chapter or five hundred dollars ($500), whichever is
greater. The department shall waive the penalty upon verification that the person has discontinued
distribution or sales of the covered beverage containers within thirty (30) days of the date the
penalty is assessed.
(f) For a producer or producer responsibility organization out of compliance with the
requirements of this chapter, the department shall provide written notification and offer
information. For the purposes of this section, written notification serves as notice of the violation.
The department shall issue at least one notice of violation by certified mail prior to assessing a
penalty and the department may only impose a penalty on a producer that has not met the
requirements of this chapter sixty (60) days following the date the written notification of the
violation was received.
(g) Pursuant to any person who incurs a penalty or receives an order may appeal the penalty
or order pursuant to the provisions of chapter 35 of title 42 ("administrative procedures").
(h) Penalties levied under this section shall be deposited in the recycling refund program
account created in the provisions of § 23-19.20-22.
23-19.20-21. Anticompetitive conduct.
A recycling refund producer responsibility organization that arranges collection, recycling,
LC005461 - Page 25 of 27

or other services under this chapter may engage in anticompetitive conduct to the extent necessary
to plan and implement collection, recycling, or other services to meet the obligations under the
provisions of this chapter, and is immune from liability under State of Rhode Island laws relating
to antitrust, restraint of trade, and unfair trade practices.
23-19.20-22. Recycling refund program account.
(a) The recycling refund program account is created in the custody of the general treasurer.
All receipts received by the department under this chapter shall be deposited in the account.
(b) Expenditures from the account shall be used by the department only for implementing,
administering, and enforcing the requirements of this chapter related to the recycling refund
program. Only the director of the department shall authorize expenditures from the account. The
account is subject to the allotment procedures under this chapter, but an appropriation is not
required for expenditures.
23-19.20-23. Rulemaking and regulations.
The department shall adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this
chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005461
========
LC005461 - Page 26 of 27